Utah statutes.
9-7-214.   Intentionally defacing, injuring, destroying, or refusing to
return property -- Misdemeanor.
Whoever intentionally defaces, injures, or refuses to return on demand, or
destroys any property belonging to the state library or loaned through its
coordinating agencies or facilities, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
